Hawaii statutes.
§707-732 Sexual assault in the third
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of sexual assault in the third
degree if:

(a) The person recklessly subjects another person to
an act of sexual penetration by compulsion;

(b) The person knowingly subjects to sexual contact
another person who is less than fourteen years old or causes such a person to
have sexual contact with the person;

(c) The person knowingly engages in sexual contact
with a person who is at least fourteen years old but less than sixteen years
old or causes the minor to have sexual contact with the person; provided that:

(i) The person is not less than five years
older than the minor; and

(ii) The person is not legally married to the
minor;

(d) The person knowingly subjects to sexual contact
another person who is mentally defective, mentally incapacitated, or physically
helpless, or causes such a person to have sexual contact with the actor;

(e) The person, while employed:

(i) In a state correctional facility;

(ii) By a private company providing services
at a correctional facility;

(iii) By a private company providing community‑based
residential services to persons committed to the director of public safety and
having received notice of this statute;

(iv) By a private correctional facility
operating in the State of Hawaii; or

(v) As a law enforcement officer as defined
in section [710-1000],

knowingly subjects to sexual contact an
imprisoned person, a person confined to a detention facility, a person
committed to the director of public safety, a person residing in a private
correctional facility operating in the State of Hawaii, or a person in custody,
or causes the person to have sexual contact with the actor; or

(f) The person knowingly, by strong compulsion, has
sexual contact with another person or causes another person to have sexual
contact with the actor.

Paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e) shall not be
construed to prohibit practitioners licensed under chapter 453 or 455 from
performing any act within their respective practices; provided further that
paragraph (e)(v) shall not be construed to prohibit a law enforcement officer
from performing a lawful search pursuant to a warrant or an exception to the
warrant clause.

(2) Sexual assault in the third degree is a
class C felony. [L 1986, c 314, pt of §57; am L 1987, c 181, §11; am L Sp 2001
2d, c 1, §§2, 7; am L 2002, c 36, §§2, 3; am L 2003, c 62, §1; am L 2004, c 10,
§15 and c 61, §5; am L 2009, c 11, §74]

Case Notes

Sexual assault in the fourth degree under §707-733(1)(a) not
an included offense of sexual assault in the third degree under subsection
(1)(b) as defined by §701-109(4). 83 H. 308, 926 P.2d 599 (1996).

Where age of victim is element of sexual offense, the
specified state of mind is not intended to apply to that element; defendant
thus strictly liable with respect to attendant circumstance of victim's age in
a sexual assault. 83 H. 308, 926 P.2d 599 (1996).

Sexual assault in the third degree, in violation of
subsection (1)(b), is not, and cannot be, a "continuing offense";
each distinct act in violation of this statute constitutes a separate offense
under the Hawaii Penal Code. 84 H. 1, 928 P.2d 843 (1996).

Circuit court did not err in instructing the jury on the
lesser included offense of sexual assault in the third degree where, although
testimony indicated that there were incidents of sexual penetration between
complainant and defendant, which would support a conviction for sexual assault
in the first degree, a rational juror could have inferred that there was "sexual
contact" prior to the penetration, i.e., that there was "touching"
of "the sexual or other intimate parts" of complainant, such as
complainant's genitalia, buttocks, or other intimate parts, or that complainant
touched defendant's "sexual or other intimate parts". 124 H. 90, 237
P.3d 1156 (2010).

Insufficient evidence existed in the record to support
defendant's conviction of sexual assault in the third degree under subsection
(1)(b) where defendant's conduct of tossing minor back and forth between
defendant and minor's father in the pool occurred "a day or two before"
the massage and the subsequent massage did not turn defendant's conduct in the
pool into a criminal offense. 125 H. 1, 249 P.3d 1141 (2011).

Substantial evidence existed in the record to support
defendant's conviction of sexual assault in the third degree under subsection
(1)(b) where minor's testimony that defendant touched minor's buttocks during
the late night massage constituted the touching of an "intimate part"
of minor's body and was credible evidence of sufficient quality and probative
value to enable a person of reasonable caution to support a conclusion that
defendant knowingly subjected minor, who was eleven years old at the time, to
sexual contact. 125 H. 1, 249 P.3d 1141 (2011).

There was overwhelming and compelling evidence tending to
show defendant guilty beyond a reasonable doubt of two counts of sexual assault
in the third degree, where defendant subjected victim to sexual contact by
placing defendant's hand and mouth on victim's breast, respectively, by strong
compulsion, and did so knowingly as to each element of the offense. 126 H.
267, 270 P.3d 997 (2011).

"Mentally defective". 5 H. App. 659, 706 P.2d 1333
(1985).

Based on §701-109(4)(a), fourth degree sexual assault under
§707-733(1)(a) is a lesser included offense of third degree sexual assault
under subsection (1)(e). 85 H. 92 (App.), 937 P.2d 933 (1997).

Third degree sexual assault committed in violation of
subsection (1)(e) not a continuous offense; defendant's convictions of five
counts of that offense, each based on a separate sexual contact thus did not
violate §701-109(1)(e). 85 H. 92 (App.), 937 P.2d 933 (1997).

Placement of the elemental attendant circumstances after the
state of mind in the enumerated elements instruction was not error; when read
and considered as a whole, the instructions adequately informed the jury of the
prosecution's burden to prove that complainant did not consent to the acts
alleged and was not married to defendant at the time, and that defendant was
aware of both circumstances when defendant acted. 97 H. 140 (App.), 34 P.3d
1039 (2000).

Although criminal sanctions are clearly directed only at
adult conduct under subsection (1)(b) and §707-730(1)(b), there is no
legislative history that supports a conclusion that only adults were intended
to be prohibited from the proscribed sexual conduct; when the legislature amended
subsection (1) and §707-730(1) in 2001, and could have, but did not include
language allowing consensual sexual conduct between, for example, two thirteen
year olds, the legislative intent was to maintain the existing prohibitions
against such conduct. 121 H. 92 (App.), 214 P.3d 1082 (2009).

Section 707-730(1)(b) and subsection (1)(b), as applied to
private consensual acts between two persons, including minors, did not violate
minor's right to privacy as the State has at least a significant interest in
regulating the sexual activities of children under the age of fourteen; in addition,
there is no fundamental personal privacy right for minors under the age of
fourteen to engage in sexual activities with other children under the age of
fourteen; this applies to young boys, as well as to young girls, and is not
strictly dependent on an age differential between the children. 121 H. 92
(App.), 214 P.3d 1082 (2009).

State's exercise of prosecutorial discretion in the case was
not constitutionally infirm where defendant failed to meet the burden of
demonstrating that defendant was prosecuted based on an arbitrary
classification; defendant was prosecuted under §707-730 and this section based
on allegations that defendant was significantly older than child #1, had
initiated the prohibited sexual activities with child #1 and child #2, and had
engaged in multiple instances of prohibited sexual contact with more than one
child. 121 H. 92 (App.), 214 P.3d 1082 (2009).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next